Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.505.080

Budget—Disposition of copies.

Copies of the budgets for all local school districts, including the four-year budget plan prepared under RCW 28A.505.040, shall be filed with the superintendent of public instruction no later than September 10th. One copy will be retained by the educational service district.

[ 2019 c 208 s 4; 1984 c 128 s 8; 1983 c 59 s 5; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118 s 8. Formerly RCW 28A.65.435.]

NOTES:

Application—Effective date—Severability—1983 c 59: See notes following RCW 28A.505.010.

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 118: See note following RCW 28A.505.010.